California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 assessor, to file a change in ownership statement with the county recorder or assessor. The change in ownership statement must be filed at the time of recording or, if the transfer is not recorded, within 90 days of the date of the change in ownership, except that where the change in ownership has occurred by reason of death the statement shall be filed within 150 days after the date of death or, if the estate is probated, shall be filed at the time the inventory and appraisal is filed. The failure to file a change in ownership statement within 90 days from the date a written request is mailed by the assessor results in a penalty of either: (1) one hundred dollars ($100), or (2) 10 percent of the taxes applicable to the new base year value reflecting the change in ownership of the real property, manufactured home, or floating home, whichever is greater, but not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) if the property is eligible for the homeowners’ exemption or twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) if the
 property is not eligible for the homeowners’ exemption if that failure to file was not willful. This penalty will be added to the assessment roll and shall be collected like any other delinquent property taxes, and be subject to the same penalties for nonpayment.”

(d) The change in ownership statement may be attached to or accompany the deed or other document evidencing a change in ownership filed for recording, in which case the notice, declaration under penalty of perjury, and any information contained in the deed or other transfer document otherwise required by subdivision (c) may be omitted.

(e) If the document evidencing a change in ownership is recorded in the county recorder’s office, then the statement shall be filed with the recorder at the time of recordation. However, the recordation of the deed or other document evidencing a change in ownership shall not be
 denied or delayed because of the failure to file a change of ownership statement, or filing of an incomplete statement, in accordance with this subdivision. If the document evidencing a change in ownership is not recorded or is recorded without the concurrent filing of a change in ownership statement, then the statement shall be filed with the assessor no later than 90 days from the date the change in ownership occurs, except that where the change in ownership has occurred by reason of death the statement shall be filed within 150 days after the date of death or, if the estate is probated, shall be filed at the time the inventory and appraisal is filed.

(f) Whenever a change in ownership statement is filed with the county recorder’s office, the recorder shall transmit, as soon as possible, the original statement or a true copy thereof to the assessor along with a copy of every recorded document as required by Section 255.7.

(g) (1) The change in ownership statement may be filed with the assessor through the United States mail, properly addressed with the postage prepaid.

(2) A change in ownership statement that is filed with the assessor, as authorized by paragraph (1), shall be deemed filed on either the date of the postmark affixed by the United States Postal Service containing the statement or on the date certified by a bona fide private courier service on the envelope containing the statement.

(h) In the case of a corporation, the change in ownership statement shall be signed either by an officer of the corporation or an employee or agent who has been designated in writing by the board of directors to sign those statements on behalf of the corporation. In the case of a partnership, limited liability company, or
 other legal entity, the statement shall be signed by an officer, partner, manager, or an employee or agent who has been designated in writing by the partnership, limited liability company, or legal entity.

(i) No person or entity acting for or on behalf of the parties to a transfer of real property shall incur liability for the consequences of assistance rendered to the transferee in preparation of any change in ownership statement, and no action may be brought or maintained against any person or entity as a result of that assistance.

Nothing in this section shall create a duty, either directly or by implication, that the assistance be rendered by any person or entity acting for or on behalf of parties to a transfer of real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 454, Sec. 6.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

480.1.

(a) Whenever there is a change in control of any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 64, a signed change in ownership statement as provided for in subdivision (b), shall be filed by the person or legal entity acquiring ownership control of the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity with the board at its office in Sacramento within 90 days from the date of the change in control of the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity. The statement shall list all counties in which the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or legal entity owns real property.

(b) The change in ownership statement as required
 pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be declared to be true under penalty of perjury and shall give such information relative to the ownership control acquisition transaction as the board shall prescribe after consultation with the California Assessors’ Association. The information shall include, but not be limited to, a description of the property owned by the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity, the parties to the transaction, and the date of the ownership control acquisition. The change in ownership statement shall not include any question which is not germane to the assessment function. The statement shall contain a notice that is printed, with the title in at least 12-point boldface type and the body in at least 8-point boldface type, in the following form:

“Important Notice”

“The law requires any person or legal entity acquiring ownership control in any corporation,
 partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity owning real property in California subject to local property taxation to complete and file a change in ownership statement with the State Board of Equalization at its office in Sacramento. The change in ownership statement must be filed within 90 days from the date of the change in control of a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity. The law further requires that a change in ownership statement be completed and filed whenever a written request is made therefor by the State Board of Equalization, regardless of whether a change in control of the legal entity has occurred. The failure to file a change in ownership statement within 90 days from the earlier of the date of the change in control of the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity, or the date of a written request by the State Board of Equalization, results in a penalty of 10 percent of the taxes applicable to the new base
 year value reflecting the change in control of the real property owned by the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or legal entity (or 10 percent of the current year’s taxes on that property if no change in control occurred). This penalty will be added to the assessment roll and shall be collected like any other delinquent property taxes, and be subject to the same penalties for nonpayment.”

(c) In the case of a corporation, the change in ownership statement shall be signed either by an officer of the corporation or an employee or agent who has been designated in writing by the board of directors to sign such statements on behalf of the corporation. In the case of a partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity, the statement shall be signed by an officer, partner, manager, or an employee or agent who has been designated in writing by the partnership, limited liability company, or legal entity.

(d) No person or entity acting for or on behalf of the parties to a transfer of real property shall incur liability for the consequences of assistance rendered to the transferee in preparation of any change in ownership statement, and no action may be brought or maintained against any person or entity as a result of that assistance.

Nothing in this section shall create a duty, either directly or by implication, that such assistance be rendered by any person or entity acting for or on behalf of parties to a transfer of real property.

(e) The board or assessors may inspect any and all records and documents of a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or legal entity to ascertain whether a change in control as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 64 has occurred. The corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or legal
 entity shall upon request, make those documents available to the board during normal business hours.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 20, for purposes of this section “State Board of Equalization” and “board” mean the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 58.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

480.2.

(a) Whenever there is a change in ownership of any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 64, a signed change in ownership statement as provided in subdivision (b) shall be filed by the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity with the board at its office in Sacramento within 90 days from the date of the change in ownership of the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity. The statement shall list all counties in which the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or legal entity owns real property.

(b) The change in ownership statement required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be declared to be true and under
 penalty of perjury and shall give such information relative to the ownership interest acquisition transaction as the board shall prescribe after consultation with the California Assessors’ Association. The information shall include, but not be limited to, a description of the property owned by the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity, the parties to the transaction, the date of the ownership interest acquisition, and a listing of the “original coowners” of the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity prior to the transaction. The change in ownership statement shall not include any question which is not germane to the assessment function. The statement shall contain a notice that is printed, with the title in at least 12-point boldface type and the body in at least 8-point boldface type, in the following form:

“Important Notice”

“The law
 requires any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity owning real property in California subject to local property taxation and transferring shares or other ownership interest in such legal entity which constitute a change in ownership pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 64 of the Revenue and Taxation Code to complete and file a change in ownership statement with the State Board of Equalization at its office in Sacramento. The change in ownership statement must be filed within 90 days from the date that shares or other ownership interests representing cumulatively more than 50 percent of the total control or ownership interests in the entity are transferred by any of the original coowners in one or more transactions. The law further requires that a change in ownership statement be completed and filed whenever a written request is made therefor by the State Board of Equalization, regardless of whether a change in ownership of the legal entity has occurred. The failure to
 file a change in ownership statement within 90 days from the earlier of the date of the change in ownership of the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity, or the date of a written request by the Board of Equalization, results in a penalty of 10 percent of the taxes applicable to the new base year value reflecting the change in ownership of the real property owned by the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or legal entity (or 10 percent of the current year’s taxes on that real property if no change in ownership occurred). This penalty will be added to the assessment roll and shall be collected like any other delinquent property taxes, and be subject to the same penalties for nonpayment.”

(c) In the case of a corporation, the change in ownership statement shall be signed either by an officer of the corporation or an employee or agent who has been designated in writing by the board of
 directors to sign such statements on behalf of the corporation. In the case of a partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity, the statement shall be signed by an officer, partner, manager, or an employee or agent who has been designated in writing by the partnership, limited liability company, or legal entity.

(d) No person or entity acting for or on behalf of the parties to a transfer of real property shall incur liability for the consequences of assistance rendered to the transferee in preparation of any change in ownership statement, and no action may be brought or maintained against any person or entity as a result of that assistance.

Nothing in this section shall create a duty, either directly or by implication, that such assistance be rendered by any person or entity acting for or on behalf of parties to a transfer of real property.

(e) The board or assessors may inspect any and all records and documents of a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or legal entity to ascertain whether a change in ownership as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 64 has occurred. The corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or legal entity shall upon request, make those documents available to the board during normal business hours.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 20, for purposes of this section “State Board of Equalization” and “board” mean the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 37, Sec. 59.   (AB 1817)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

480.3.

(a) Each county assessor and recorder shall make available, without charge and upon request, a form entitled “Preliminary Change of Ownership Report,” which transferees of real property shall complete and may file with the recorder concurrent with the recordation of any document effecting a change in ownership. The form shall be signed by the transferee or an officer of the transferee certifying that the
 information provided on the form is, to the best of his or her knowledge and belief, true, correct, and complete. The form shall not be signed by an agent acting for a transferee.

(b) If a document evidencing a change in ownership is presented to the recorder for recordation without the concurrent filing of a preliminary change in ownership report, the recorder may charge an additional recording fee of twenty dollars ($20).

(c) Noncompliance with this section by the transferee shall not delay or preclude the recordation of documents if the additional fee specified in subdivision (b) is tendered.

(d) The authority to obtain information pursuant to this section is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any existing authority the assessor has under this article.

(e) In cases where the county tax collector files purchaser’s deeds with respect to a sale for defaulted taxes, the information given to the assessor pursuant to Sections 3716 and 3811 shall be deemed to constitute compliance with this section.

(f) The filing of a preliminary change of ownership report or the payment of an additional recording fee shall not be required of any intermediate transferee of property, or of any trustee issuing a trustee’s deed to the mortgagee or beneficiary of a mortgage or deed of trust, or his or her assignees, pursuant to the exercise of a power of sale contained in a deed of trust or mortgage pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2920) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code. For purposes of this subdivision, “intermediate transferee” means any transferee who is acting as both a transferee and the transferor of the same property as part of a series of simultaneous transfers
 which affect that property and who records the transfer documents and any other recorded documents related to the transfer in consecutive order at one time.

(g) Except as prescribed in subdivisions (e) and (f), this section shall apply to changes of ownership occurring on or after July 1, 1985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 67, Sec. 7.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

480.4.

(a) The preliminary change of ownership report referred to in Section 480.3 shall give information relative to the transfer. The information shall include, but not be limited to, a description of the property, the parties to the transaction, the date of acquisition, the amount, if any, of the consideration paid for the property, whether paid in money or otherwise,
 and the terms of the transaction. The preliminary change in ownership report shall not include any question that is not germane to the assessment function. 

(b) The State Board of Equalization, after consultation with the California Assessors’ Association and interested parties, shall prescribe the preliminary change of ownership report for the purpose of maintaining statewide uniformity in the contents of the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 67, Sec. 8.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

480.5.

(a) Every owner of tax-exempt real property shall report to the local assessor the creation, renewal, sublease, or assignment of any lease, sublease, license, use permit, or other document which conveys the right to use that real property within 60 days of the transaction. The report shall include all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the owner.

(2) The names and addresses of all other parties to the transaction, including an identification of each party and of his or her possessory interest.

(3) The type of transaction, whether creation, renewal, sublease, or assignment.

(4) A description of the property.

(5) The date of the transaction.

(6) The terms of the transaction, including all of the following:

(A) The consideration for the possessory interest, whether paid in money or otherwise.

(B) The term of the possessory interest, including any renewal or extension options.

(C) If a sublease, the original term, the remaining term, and the consideration paid for the master lease.

(D) If an
 assignment, the original term, the remaining term, and the consideration paid for the underlying lease.

(b) This section shall be applicable only in those counties in which the board of supervisors, by ordinance or resolution, specifically elects to have this section applicable in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 892, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

480.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a holder of a possessory interest in real property that is owned by a state or local governmental entity is not required to file a preliminary change in ownership report or change in ownership statement with respect to any renewal of that possessory interest. Instead, every state or local governmental entity that is the fee owner of real property in which one or more taxable possessory interests have been created shall either file any preliminary change in ownership report or change in ownership
 statement otherwise required to be filed with respect to any renewal of a possessory interest, or annually file with the county assessor, no later than the 15th day of the first month following the month in which the lien date occurs, a real property usage report. The report shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name and address of the fee owner of the real property.

(2) The name and address of each holder of a possessory interest in the real property.

(3) The types of transactions in which the holders of the possessory interests acquired those interests, whether creations, renewals, subleases, or assignments.

(4) The description of the subject real property.

(5) The date
 of each transaction in which a holder of a possessory interest in the real property acquired that interest.

(6) The terms of each transaction described in paragraph (5), including all the following:

(A) The consideration given for the possessory interest, whether paid in money or otherwise.

(B) The terms of the possessory interest, including any renewal or extension option.

(C) For any subleases, the original term and remaining term of the sublease, and the consideration paid for the master lease.

(D) For any assignments, the original term and remaining term of the assignment, and the consideration paid for the underlying lease.

(b) The failure of a state or local governmental entity to comply with this filing requirement shall not give rise to any interest or penalties assessed against the holder of the possessory interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 171, Sec. 4.   Effective July 17, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

480.7.

(a) On or after January 1, 1996, in addition to any filing required to be made pursuant to Section 441, 480, 480.1, or 480.2, any domestic life insurance company that has established a separate account pursuant to Section 10506 of the Insurance Code, or any foreign life insurance company that has established a separate account pursuant to the corresponding insurance laws of its state of domicile, shall file with the assessor a signed statement of transfer as described in subdivision (b) with respect to any transfer of real property, located
 within the county, to or from that separate account.

(b) The statement of transfer required to be filed by subdivision (a) shall comply with all of the following conditions:

(1) The statement of transfer shall be subscribed under penalty of perjury.

(2) The statement of transfer shall identify all of the following:

(A) The separate account to which or from which the real property was transferred.

(B) The parties to the transfer.

(C) The date of transfer and the amount, if any, of consideration given with respect to the transfer, whether paid in the form of money or otherwise.

(D) The name and address of a contact person for any questions with respect to the separate account.

(E) Any other information with respect to the transfer as prescribed by the State Board of Equalization, after consultation with the California Assessor’s Association.

(3) The statement of transfer shall not be required to include any information that is not relevant to the assessment function.

(4) The statement of transfer shall be signed by either an officer of the filing life insurance company, or by an employee or agent of that insurance company who has been designated in writing by the company’s board of directors to sign the statement of transfer on the company’s behalf.

(5) The statement
 of transfer shall be filed with the assessor either in person or through the United States mail, properly addressed with the postage prepaid.

(c) Any life insurance company required by subdivision (a) to file a statement of transfer that fails to file that statement within 45 days from the date of the subject transfer of real property shall be subject to a penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000), in addition to any other penalty prescribed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 933, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

480.8.

(a) (1) For purposes of complying with the change in ownership provisions of Section 65.1 and subdivision (i) of Section 61, upon a written request of the county assessor, the owners of a cooperative housing corporation, community apartment project, condominium, planned unit development, or other residential subdivision complex with common areas or facilities in which units or lots are transferred without the use of recorded deeds, shall file an ownership report on or before the first February 1 that follows an assessor
 request, and on or before each February 1 thereafter. The ownership report shall include all of the following information:

(A) The full name and mailing address of each owner, stockholder, or holder of an ownership interest in the property and a copy of the stock certificate, or other document that evidences an interest in the unit or lot. Copies of stock certificates and other documents evidencing an interest in an individual unit or lot that were provided to the county assessor in a previous ownership report are not required to be provided in subsequent ownership reports.

(B) The situs address, including the number, of each unit or lot.

(C) The date that an ownership interest in the property was acquired and the acquisition price of that interest.

(2) The ownership report described in paragraph (1) applies to units or lots of residential property for which the individual units or lots consist of dwellings that could be eligible for homeowners’ exemption if occupied as a principal place of residence.

(b) (1) If the ownership report request described in subdivision (a) is not complied with, the assessor may send a change in ownership statement to every owner, tenant-shareholder, or occupant of each individual unit or lot. If the assessor sends a change in ownership statement pursuant to this paragraph, a notice shall be included with that statement informing occupants who do not have an ownership interest in the unit or lot to forward the statement to the owner or shareholder of the unit or lot.

(2) Failure to file the change in ownership statement described in paragraph (1) shall result in
 the penalty described in subdivision (a) of Section 482 for each individual unit or lot whose owner or shareholder fails to independently file the change in ownership statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 450, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

481.

All information requested by the assessor or the board pursuant to this article or furnished in the change in ownership statement shall be held secret by the assessor and the board. All information furnished in either the preliminary change in ownership statement or the change in ownership statement shall be held secret by those authorized by law to receive or have access to this information. These statements are not public documents and are not open to inspection, except as provided in Section 408.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 200, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

482.

(a) (1) If a person or legal entity required to file a statement described in Section 480 fails to do so within 90 days from the date a written request is mailed by the assessor, a penalty of either: (A) one hundred dollars ($100), or (B) 10 percent of the taxes applicable to the new base year value reflecting the change in ownership of the real property, manufactured home, or floating home, whichever is greater, but not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) if the property is eligible for the homeowners’ exemption or twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) if the property is not eligible for the homeowners’ exemption if the failure to file was not willful, shall, except as otherwise provided in this section, be added to the assessment made on the roll. The penalty shall
 apply for failure to file a complete change in ownership statement notwithstanding the fact that the assessor determines that no change in ownership has occurred as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 60) of Part 0.5. The penalty may also be applied if after a request the transferee files an incomplete statement and does not supply the missing information upon a second request.

(2) The assessor shall mail the written request specified in paragraph (1) to the mailing address of the transferee as provided by subdivision (f).

(b) If a person or legal entity required to file a statement described in Section 480.1 or 480.2 fails to do so within 90 days from the earlier of (1) the date of the change in control or the change in ownership of the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity, or (2) the date of a written request by the State Board of
 Equalization, a penalty of 10 percent of the taxes applicable to the new base year value reflecting the change in control or change in ownership of the real property owned by the corporation, partnership, or legal entity, or 10 percent of the current year’s taxes on that property if no change in control or change in ownership occurred, shall be added by the county assessor to the assessment made on the roll. The penalty shall apply for failure to file a complete statement with the board notwithstanding the fact that the board determines that no change in control or change in ownership has occurred as defined in subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 64. The penalty may also be applied if after a request the person or legal entity files an incomplete statement and does not supply the missing information upon that second request to complete the statement. That penalty shall be in lieu of the penalty provisions of subdivision (a).

(c) The penalty for
 failure to file a timely statement pursuant to Sections 480, 480.1, and 480.2 for any one transfer may be imposed only one time, even though the assessor may initiate a request as often as he or she deems necessary.

(d) The penalty shall be added to the roll in the same manner as a special assessment and treated, collected, and subject to the same penalties for the delinquency as all other taxes on the roll in which it is entered.

(1) When the transfer to be reported under this section is of a portion of a property or parcel appearing on the roll during the fiscal year in which the 90-day period expires, the current year’s taxes shall be prorated so the penalty will be computed on the proportion of property which has transferred.

(2) Any penalty added to the roll pursuant to this section between January 1 and June 30
 may be entered either on the unsecured roll or the roll being prepared. After January 1, the penalty may be added to the current roll only with the approval of the tax collector.

(3) If the property is transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value or becomes subject to a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value after the transfer of ownership resulting in the imposition of the penalty and before the enrollment of the penalty, the penalty shall be entered on the unsecured roll in the name of the transferee whose failure to file the change in ownership statement resulted in the imposition of the penalty.

(e) When a penalty imposed pursuant to this section is entered on the unsecured roll, the tax collector may immediately file a certificate authorized by Section 2191.3.

(f) Notice of any penalty added to
 either the secured or unsecured roll pursuant to this section, which shall identify the parcel or parcels for which the penalty is assessed, and the written request to file a statement specified in subdivision (a), which shall identify the real property, manufactured home, or floating home for which the statement is required to be filed, shall be mailed by the assessor to the transferee at his or her address contained in any recorded instrument or document evidencing a transfer of an interest in real property, manufactured home, or floating home or the address specified for mailing tax information contained in the preliminary change in ownership report. If the transferee has subsequently notified the assessor of a change in address for mailing tax information, the assessor shall mail the notice of any penalty, or the written request to file a statement specified in subdivision (a), to this address. If there is no address specified for mailing tax information on either the recorded instrument, the document
 evidencing a transfer of an interest in real property, manufactured home, or floating home or on the filed preliminary change in ownership report, and the transferee has not provided an address for purposes of mailing tax information, the assessor shall mail the notice of any penalty, or the written request to file a statement specified in subdivision (a), to the transferee at any address reasonably known to the assessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 454, Sec. 7.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

482.1.

If there is a failure to file a change in ownership statement within the time required by subdivision (b) of Section 480, the successor in interest to the decedent’s property shall be subject to the applicable penalty provided in Section 482.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1141, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

483.

(a) If the assessee establishes to the satisfaction of the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board that the failure to file the change in ownership statement within the time required by subdivision (a) of Section 482 was due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the assessee’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care in the absence of willful neglect, and has filed the statement with the assessor, the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board may order the penalty abated, provided the assessee has
 filed with the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board a written application for abatement of the penalty no later than 60 days after the date on which the assessee was notified of the penalty.

If the penalty is abated it shall be canceled or refunded in the same manner as an amount of tax erroneously charged or collected.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall not apply in any county in which the board of supervisors adopts a resolution to that effect. In that county the penalty provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 482 shall be abated if the assessee files the change of ownership statement with the assessor no later than 60 days after the date on which the assessee was notified of the penalty.

If the penalty is abated it shall be canceled
 or refunded in the same manner as an amount of tax erroneously charged or collected.

(c) (1) If a person or legal entity establishes to the satisfaction of the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board that the failure to file the change in ownership statement within the time required by subdivision (b) of Section 482 was due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the assessee’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care in the absence of willful neglect, and has filed the statement with the State Board of Equalization, the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board may order the penalty be abated, provided the person or legal entity has filed with the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board a written application for abatement of the
 penalty no later than 60 days after the date on which the person or legal entity was notified of the penalty by the assessor.

(2) If a written request to file a change in ownership statement, including a written request to file a complete change in ownership statement, is mailed by the State Board of Equalization to a person or legal entity as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 482, and the assessor determines that the written request was based on erroneous information in the possession of the board provided by any person or entity, including, but not limited to, the Franchise Tax Board, a county assessor, or board staff, the assessor shall abate the penalty if the person or legal entity required to comply with the written request notifies both the board and the county assessor responsible for assessing the penalty of the error no
 later than 60 days after the date on which the person or legal entity is notified of the penalty.

(3) If the penalty is abated, it shall be canceled or refunded in the same manner as an amount of tax erroneously charged or collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 501, Sec. 2.   (AB 571)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

484.

With the exception of the penalty provision of Section 463, the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 441) shall be available to the assessor for the purposes of securing change in ownership information required for assessment purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------

485.

If, after written request by the assessor, any person fails to comply with any provision of law for furnishing information required by Section 480, the assessor, based upon information in his possession, shall estimate the value of the property and, based upon this estimate, promptly assess the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

487.

Any life insurance company that completes a real property transaction for which approval was obtained from the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Section 10506 of the Insurance Code shall, upon completing that transaction, file with the assessor of the county in which the real property is located a certified copy of the application that the insurance company filed with the Insurance Commissioner with respect to the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 933, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Arbitrary and Penal Assessments [501. - 506.]

501.

If after written request by the assessor, any person fails to comply with any provision of law for furnishing information required by Sections 441 and 470, the assessor, based upon information in his possession, shall estimate the value of the property and, based upon this estimate, promptly assess the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1633.)
-------------------------------------------

502.

If any person willfully conceals, fails to disclose, removes, transfers or misrepresents tangible personal property to evade taxation which results in an assessment lower than that which would otherwise be required by law, the assessor on discovery shall assess the property in the lawful amount and impose the penalty provided for in Section 504.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1418.)
-------------------------------------------

503.

If any taxpayer or the taxpayer’s agent through a fraudulent act or omission causes, or if any fraudulent collusion between the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s agent and the assessor or any of the assessor’s deputies causes, any taxable tangible property to escape assessment in whole or in part, or to be underassessed, the assessor shall assess the property in the lawful amount and add a penalty of 75 percent of the additional assessed value so assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

504.
